Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Fairs
247.228.
Advisory subcommittees — Membership.

The North American International Livestock Exposition Executive Committee shall have advisory subcommittees which shall provide advice and recommendations to the committee regarding exposition matters. These subcommittees shall be inclusive of all livestock approved to participate at the North American International Livestock Exposition. Members shall be experienced or knowledgeable in skills which would assist in the management of the Exposition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2016 ch. 142, § 8, effective April 27, 2016.

247.230.
Regulations as to premiums; payment. [Repealed.]